Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
666

LANDLORD
AND TENANT

Part I. Generally

Section

666-1 Summary possession on termination or
forfeiture of

lease

666-2 Tenancy from month to month, etc.;
termination,

extension

666-3 Forfeiture, warning, notice to vacate,
refunds

666-4 Oral leases not exceeding one year, valid

666-5 Acceptance of rent during litigation,
effect of

666-6 Summary possession proceedings; venue

666-7 Jurisdiction; joinder

666-8 Service

666-9 Return day

666-10 Repealed

666-11 Judgment; writ of possession

666-12 How writ executed

666-13 Effect of writ

666-14 Writ stayed how, in proceedings for
nonpayment of rent

666-15 to 19 Repealed

666-20 Rent control ordinances

666-21 Rent trust fund

Part II. Health Requirements in Rental
Dwellings

666-41 to 45 Repealed

Cross References

Residential landlord and tenant code, see chapter 521.

In case of conflict, chapter 521 controls, see §521-3(b).

Case Notes

Long-term residential ground leases cannot be canceled or
forfeited in district court summary possession action under this chapter. 74
H. 294, 845 P.2d 1186 (1992).

Chapter does not preclude a landlord from joining a breach of
contract action, seeking damages as measured by future rent, with a summary
possession action. 84 H. 75, 929 P.2d 88 (1996).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next